West Virginia, session 2025, HB3167.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Chapter 49. Child Welfare. Article 12. COURT ACTIONS. §49-4-611. Court order of a 12-panel hair follicle drug test. (a) At any point after a petition has been filed, pursuant to §49-4-601 of this code, a circuit court may order that a respondent undergo a 12-panel hair follicle drug test to assess an individual’s usage of a controlled substance over the past 90 days through the testing of a collected hair sample. (b) For any child two months of age or younger, if a respondent birth mother’s 12-panel hair follicle drug test indicates usage of a controlled substance over the past 90 days a neurological examination by a pediatric neurologist may be ordered by the circuit court.(c) Any attempt to alter the hair of a respondent, in a manner intended to evade detection of the usage of a controlled substance, after a 12-panel hair follicle drug test has been ordered by the circuit court, shall be considered a positive test result for the usage of a controlled substance. For purposes of this subsection, an attempt to alter the hair of a respondent includes the following:(1) Shaving;(2) Coloring or dyeing;(3) Bleaching; (4) Electrolysis, or other mechanical or surgical hair removal process; or(5) Chemical hair removal.(d) Failure to comply with a court ordered 12-panel hair follicle drug test shall be considered a positive test result for the usage of a controlled substance.(e) Any result from a 12-panel hair follicle drug test may be reported to all members of the multidisciplinary treatment team as provided in §49-4-405, subject to any limitations that are ordered by a circuit court.(f)  At any point after an allegation is made, prior to the filing of a petition pursuant to §49-4-601 of the code, the respondent may rebut a positive drug result by submitting to a 12 panel hair follicle drug test. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home